Wisconsin, session 2025, AB806.
do enact as follows:AB806,11Section 1. 51.30 (5) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB806,2,9251.30 (5) (b) 1. The guardian of an individual who is adjudicated incompetent 3in this state shall have access to the individual’s court and treatment records at all 4times. The parent, guardian, or person in the place of a parent of a developmentally 5disabled minor shall have access to the minor’s court and treatment records at all 6times except in the case of a minor aged 14 or older who files a written objection to 7such access with the custodian of the records. The parent, guardian, or person in 8the place of a parent of other minors shall have the same rights of access as 9provided to subject individuals under this section.AB806,210Section 2. 51.30 (5) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB806,2,171151.30 (5) (bm) Parents denied physical placement who may not access a child’s 12court or treatment records. A parent who has been denied periods of physical 13placement with a child under s. 767.41 (4) (b) or 767.451 (4) and the parent of a 14minor who has been adjudged to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 15because of an action by the parent or the parent’s failure to act may not have the 16rights of a parent or guardian under pars. (a) and (b) with respect to access to that 17child’s court or treatment records.AB806,318Section 3. 146.835 of the statutes is amended to read:AB806,3,619146.835 Parents denied physical placement rights who may not 1access a child’s patient health care records. A parent who has been denied 2periods of physical placement under s. 767.41 (4) (b) or 767.451 (4) and the parent of 3a minor who has been adjudged to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 4because of an action by the parent or the parent’s failure to act may not have the 5rights of a parent or guardian under this chapter with respect to access to that 6child’s patient health care records under s. 146.82 or 146.83.AB806,47Section 4. 252.15 (3m) (d) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:AB806,3,118252.15 (3m) (d) 1m. Notwithstanding par. (c), to a parent or legal custodian of 9a minor who is 14 years of age or older, except for the parent of a minor who has 10been adjudged to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 because of an 11action by the parent or the parent’s failure to act.AB806,3,1212